Hawaii statutes.
B. Budget

§302A-1301 School system financial
accountability. (a) Beginning with the 1995-1997 fiscal biennium, the
department's administrative expenditures shall not exceed 6.5 per cent of the
total department operating budget, excluding expenditures for agencies
administratively attached to the department, unless approved by the
legislature.

(b) Not less than seventy per cent of
appropriations for the total budget of the department, excluding debt service
and capital improvement programs and appropriations for agencies
administratively attached to the department, shall be expended by principals. [L
1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 51, §57; am L 2014, c 232, §15]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next